Utah, session 2026, SB42.
Section 1. Section 4-17-104 is amended to read:4-17-104Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/26. Creation of State Weed Committee -- Membership -- Powers and duties -- Expenses.(1)There is created a State Weed Committee composed of eight members, with each member representing one of the following:(a)the Department of Agriculture and Food created in Section 4-2-102;(b)the Department of Natural Resources created in Section 79-2-201;(c)the Utah State University Agricultural Experiment Station;(d)the Utah State University Extension Service;(e)the Utah Association of Counties;(f)private agricultural industry;(g)the Utah Weed Control Association; and(h)the Utah Weed Supervisors Association.(2)The commissioner shall select the members of the committee from those nominated by each of the respective groups or agencies described in Subsection (1) following approval by the executive committee of the Agricultural Advisory Board.(3)(a)Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current committee members expire, the commissioner shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.(b)Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the commissioner shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.(4)(a)Members may be removed by the commissioner for cause.(b)When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.(5)The State Weed Committee shall:(a)confer and advise on matters pertaining to the planning, implementation, and administration of the state noxious weed program;(b)recommend namesnominees to the commissioner for membership on the committee; and(c)serve as members of the executive committee of the Utah Weed Control Association.(6)A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:(a)Section 63A-3-106;(b)Section 63A-3-107; and(c)rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant tounder Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-1-204 is amended to read:63I-1-204Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 4.(1)Section 4-2-108, Agricultural Advisory Board created -- Composition -- Responsibility -- Terms of office -- Compensation -- Executive committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 4-17-104, Creation of State Weed Committee -- Membership -- Powers and duties -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(3)Title 4, Chapter 18, Part 3, Utah Soil Health Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(4)Section 4-20-103, Utah Grazing Improvement Program Advisory Board -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2032.(5)Section 4-23-104, Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board created -- Composition -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2034.(6)Section 4-23-105, Board responsibilities -- Damage prevention policy -- Rules -- Methods to control predators and depredating birds and animals, is repealed July 1, 2034.(7)Section 4-24-104, Livestock Brand Board created -- Composition -- Terms -- Removal -- Quorum for transaction of business -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2035.(8)Section 4-39-104, Domesticated Elk Act advisory council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(9)Title 4, Chapter 46, Part 2, Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(10)Subsection 4-46-304(2)(d), regarding the Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 4-46-401(3)(a), regarding the Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.